Nebraska, session 109, LB1235A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1235A LB1235A
2026 2026
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $-0- from the General
Fund and $-0- from the Nebraska State Patrol Cash Fund for FY2025-26 and
(2) $1 from the General Fund and $1 from the Nebraska State Patrol Cash
Fund for FY2026-27 to the Nebraska State Patrol, for Program 100, to aid
in carrying out the provisions of Legislative Bill 1235, One Hundred
Ninth Legislature, Second Session, 2026.
Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per
diems from funds appropriated in this section shall not exceed $-0- for
FY2025-26 or $1 for FY2026-27.
Sec. 2. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-2-